Illinois, session 104th, HB3449.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 5changing Section 3-6-3 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 5/3-6-3)7    Sec. 3-6-3. Rules and regulations for sentence credit. 8    (a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall prescribe rules 9and regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 10persons committed to the Department of Corrections and the 11Department of Juvenile Justice shall prescribe rules and 12regulations for awarding and revoking sentence credit for 13persons committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under 14Section 5-8-6 of the Unified Code of Corrections, which shall 15be subject to review by the Prisoner Review Board.16    (1.5) As otherwise provided by law, sentence credit may be 17awarded for the following: 18        (A) successful completion of programming while in 19    custody of the Department of Corrections or the Department 20    of Juvenile Justice or while in custody prior to 21    sentencing; 22        (B) compliance with the rules and regulations of the 23    Department; or   HB3449- 2 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1        (C) service to the institution, service to a 2    community, or service to the State. 3    (2) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 4subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 5shall provide the following, with respect to offenses listed 6in clause (i), (ii), or (iii) of this paragraph (2) committed 7on or after June 19, 1998 or with respect to the offense listed 8in clause (iv) of this paragraph (2) committed on or after June 923, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 94-71) or with 10respect to offense listed in clause (vi) committed on or after 11June 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-625) or with 12respect to the offense of unlawful possession of a firearm by a 13repeat felony offender committed on or after August 2, 2005 14(the effective date of Public Act 94-398) or with respect to 15the offenses listed in clause (v) of this paragraph (2) 16committed on or after August 13, 2007 (the effective date of 17Public Act 95-134) or with respect to the offense of 18aggravated domestic battery committed on or after July 23, 192010 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1224) or with 20respect to the offense of attempt to commit terrorism 21committed on or after January 1, 2013 (the effective date of 22Public Act 97-990), the following:23        (i) that a committed person prisoner who is serving a 24    term of imprisonment for first degree murder or for the 25    offense of terrorism shall receive no more than 7.5 days 26    of sentence credit for each month of his or her sentence of   HB3449- 3 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    imprisonment sentence credit and shall serve the entire 2    sentence imposed by the court;3        (ii) that a committed person prisoner serving a 4    sentence for attempt to commit terrorism, attempt to 5    commit first degree murder, solicitation of murder, 6    solicitation of murder for hire, intentional homicide of 7    an unborn child, predatory criminal sexual assault of a 8    child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 9    assault, aggravated kidnapping, aggravated battery with a 10    firearm as described in Section 12-4.2 or subdivision 11    (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), or (e)(4) of Section 12-3.05, 12    heinous battery as described in Section 12-4.1 or 13    subdivision (a)(2) of Section 12-3.05, unlawful possession 14    of a firearm by a repeat felony offender, aggravated 15    battery of a senior citizen as described in Section 12-4.6 16    or subdivision (a)(4) of Section 12-3.05, or aggravated 17    battery of a child as described in Section 12-4.3 or 18    subdivision (b)(1) of Section 12-3.05 shall receive no 19    more than 12 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of 20    his or her sentence of imprisonment;21        (iii) that a committed person prisoner serving a 22    sentence for home invasion, armed robbery, aggravated 23    vehicular hijacking, aggravated discharge of a firearm, or 24    armed violence with a category I weapon or category II 25    weapon, when the court has made and entered a finding, 26    pursuant to subsection (c-1) of Section 5-4-1 of this   HB3449- 4 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    Code, that the conduct leading to conviction for the 2    enumerated offense resulted in great bodily harm to a 3    victim, shall receive no more than 12 4.5 days of sentence 4    credit for each month of his or her sentence of 5    imprisonment;6        (iv) that a committed person prisoner serving a 7    sentence for aggravated discharge of a firearm, whether or 8    not the conduct leading to conviction for the offense 9    resulted in great bodily harm to the victim, shall receive 10    no more than 12 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month 11    of his or her sentence of imprisonment; 12        (v) that a person serving a sentence for gunrunning, 13    narcotics racketeering, controlled substance trafficking, 14    methamphetamine trafficking, drug-induced homicide, 15    aggravated methamphetamine-related child endangerment, 16    money laundering pursuant to clause (c) (4) or (5) of 17    Section 29B-1 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 18    Code of 2012, or a Class X felony conviction for delivery 19    of a controlled substance, possession of a controlled 20    substance with intent to manufacture or deliver, 21    calculated criminal drug conspiracy, criminal drug 22    conspiracy, street gang criminal drug conspiracy, 23    participation in methamphetamine manufacturing, 24    aggravated participation in methamphetamine 25    manufacturing, delivery of methamphetamine, possession 26    with intent to deliver methamphetamine, aggravated   HB3449- 5 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    delivery of methamphetamine, aggravated possession with 2    intent to deliver methamphetamine, methamphetamine 3    conspiracy when the substance containing the controlled 4    substance or methamphetamine is 100 grams or more shall 5    receive no more than 15 7.5 days sentence credit for each 6    month of his or her sentence of imprisonment; 7        (vi) that a committed person prisoner serving a 8    sentence for a second or subsequent offense of luring a 9    minor shall receive no more than 12 4.5 days of sentence 10    credit for each month of his or her sentence of 11    imprisonment; and 12        (vii) (Blank). that a prisoner serving a sentence for 13    aggravated domestic battery shall receive no more than 4.5 14    days of sentence credit for each month of his or her 15    sentence of imprisonment. 16    The sentence credit allotments listed in clauses (i) 17through (vii) of this paragraph (2) shall apply to committed 18persons incarcerated before the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and the 20Department of Corrections shall award sentence credit for 21periods of incarceration prior to the effective date of this 22amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly accordingly. 23    (2.1) For all offenses, other than those enumerated in 24subdivision (a)(2)(i), (ii), or (iii) committed on or after 25June 19, 1998 or subdivision (a)(2)(iv) committed on or after 26June 23, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 94-71) or   HB3449- 6 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1subdivision (a)(2)(v) committed on or after August 13, 2007 2(the effective date of Public Act 95-134) or subdivision 3(a)(2)(vi) committed on or after June 1, 2008 (the effective 4date of Public Act 95-625) or subdivision (a)(2)(vii) 5committed on or after July 23, 2010 (the effective date of 6Public Act 96-1224), and other than the offense of aggravated 7driving under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 8or intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 9thereof as defined in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of 10subsection (d) of Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, 11and other than the offense of aggravated driving under the 12influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 13compound or compounds, or any combination thereof as defined 14in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 15Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or 16after January 1, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 1796-1230), the rules and regulations shall provide that a 18committed person prisoner who is serving a term of 19imprisonment shall receive one day of sentence credit for each 20day of his or her sentence of imprisonment or recommitment 21under Section 3-3-9. Each day of sentence credit shall reduce 22by one day the committed person's prisoner's period of 23imprisonment or recommitment under Section 3-3-9.24    (2.2) A committed person prisoner serving a term of 25natural life imprisonment shall receive no sentence credit.26    (2.3) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this   HB3449- 7 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 2shall provide that a committed person prisoner who is serving 3a sentence for aggravated driving under the influence of 4alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 5compounds, or any combination thereof as defined in 6subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 711-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, shall receive no more 8than 12 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his or 9her sentence of imprisonment.10    (2.4) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 11subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 12shall provide with respect to the offenses of aggravated 13battery with a machine gun or a firearm equipped with any 14device or attachment designed or used for silencing the report 15of a firearm or aggravated discharge of a machine gun or a 16firearm equipped with any device or attachment designed or 17used for silencing the report of a firearm, committed on or 18after July 15, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 91-121), 19that a committed person prisoner serving a sentence for any of 20these offenses shall receive no more than 4.5 days of sentence 21credit for each month of his or her sentence of imprisonment.22    (2.5) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 23subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 24shall provide that a committed person prisoner who is serving 25a sentence for aggravated arson committed on or after July 27, 262001 (the effective date of Public Act 92-176) shall receive   HB3449- 8 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1no more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each month of his 2or her sentence of imprisonment.3    (2.6) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 4subsection (a), the rules and regulations on sentence credit 5shall provide that a committed person prisoner who is serving 6a sentence for aggravated driving under the influence of 7alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 8compounds or any combination thereof as defined in 9subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of Section 1011-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code committed on or after 11January 1, 2011 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1230) 12shall receive no more than 4.5 days of sentence credit for each 13month of his or her sentence of imprisonment.14    (3) In addition to the sentence credits earned under 15paragraphs (2.1), (4), (4.1), (4.2), and (4.7) of this 16subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 17that the Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 18Justice may award up to 180 days of earned sentence credit, 19provided that such earned sentence credit shall not reduce the 20sentence of the committed person to less than the amounts set 21forth in subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii), and (iv) of (4.7) of 22this subsection (a) for prisoners serving a sentence of 23incarceration of less than 5 years, and up to 365 days of 24earned sentence credit for prisoners serving a sentence of 5 25years or longer. The Director may grant this credit for good 26conduct in specific instances as either Director deems proper   HB3449- 9 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1for eligible persons in the custody of each Director's 2respective Department. The good conduct may include, but is 3not limited to, compliance with the rules and regulations of 4the Department, service to the Department, service to a 5community, or service to the State.6    Eligible committed persons inmates for an award of earned 7sentence credit under this paragraph (3) may be selected to 8receive the credit at either Director's or his or her 9designee's sole discretion. Eligibility for the additional 10earned sentence credit under this paragraph (3) may be based 11on, but is not limited to, participation in programming 12offered by the Department as appropriate for the committed 13person prisoner based on the results of any available 14risk/needs assessment or other relevant assessments or 15evaluations administered by the Department using a validated 16instrument, the circumstances of the crime, demonstrated 17commitment to rehabilitation by a committed person prisoner 18with a history of conviction for a forcible felony enumerated 19in Section 2-8 of the Criminal Code of 2012, the committed 20person's inmate's behavior and improvements in disciplinary 21history while incarcerated, and the committed person's 22inmate's commitment to rehabilitation, including participation 23in programming offered by the Department. 24    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 25Justice shall not award sentence credit under this paragraph 26(3) to a committed person an inmate unless the committed   HB3449- 10 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1person inmate has served a minimum of 60 days of the sentence, 2including time served in a county jail; except nothing in this 3paragraph shall be construed to permit either Director to 4extend a committed person's an inmate's sentence beyond that 5which was imposed by the court. Prior to awarding credit under 6this paragraph (3), each Director shall make a written 7determination that the committed person inmate:8        (A) is eligible for the earned sentence credit;9        (B) has served a minimum of 60 days, or as close to 60 10    days as the sentence will allow;11        (B-1) has received a risk/needs assessment or other 12    relevant evaluation or assessment administered by the 13    Department using a validated instrument; and14        (C) has met the eligibility criteria established by 15    rule for earned sentence credit.16    The Director of Corrections or the Director of Juvenile 17Justice shall determine the form and content of the written 18determination required in this subsection.19    (3.5) The Department shall provide annual written reports 20to the Governor and the General Assembly on the award of earned 21sentence credit no later than February 1 of each year. The 22Department must publish both reports on its website within 48 23hours of transmitting the reports to the Governor and the 24General Assembly. The reports must include:25        (A) the number of committed persons inmates awarded 26    earned sentence credit;  HB3449- 11 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1        (B) the average amount of earned sentence credit 2    awarded;3        (C) the holding offenses of committed persons inmates 4    awarded earned sentence credit; and5        (D) the number of earned sentence credit revocations. 6    (4)(A) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 7subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 8that any committed person prisoner who is engaged full-time in 9substance abuse programs, correctional industry assignments, 10educational programs, work-release programs or activities in 11accordance with Article 13 of Chapter III of this Code, 12behavior modification programs, life skills courses, or 13re-entry planning provided by the Department under this 14paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completes the assigned 15program as determined by the standards of the Department, 16shall receive one day of sentence credit for each day in which 17that committed person prisoner is engaged in the activities 18described in this paragraph. The rules and regulations shall 19also provide that sentence credit may be provided to a 20committed person an inmate who was held in pre-trial detention 21prior to his or her current commitment to the Department of 22Corrections and successfully completed a full-time, 60-day or 23longer substance abuse program, educational program, behavior 24modification program, life skills course, or re-entry planning 25provided by the county department of corrections or county 26jail. Calculation of this county program credit shall be done   HB3449- 12 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1at sentencing as provided in Section 5-4.5-100 of this Code 2and shall be included in the sentencing order. The rules and 3regulations shall also provide that sentence credit may be 4provided to a committed person an inmate who is in compliance 5with programming requirements in an adult transition center.6    (B) The Department shall award sentence credit under this 7paragraph (4) accumulated prior to January 1, 2020 (the 8effective date of Public Act 101-440) in an amount specified 9in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph (4) to a committed 10person an inmate serving a sentence for an offense committed 11prior to June 19, 1998, if the Department determines that the 12committed person inmate is entitled to this sentence credit, 13based upon:14        (i) documentation provided by the Department that the 15    committed person inmate engaged in any full-time substance 16    abuse programs, correctional industry assignments, 17    educational programs, behavior modification programs, life 18    skills courses, or re-entry planning provided by the 19    Department under this paragraph (4) and satisfactorily 20    completed the assigned program as determined by the 21    standards of the Department during the committed person's 22    inmate's current term of incarceration; or23        (ii) the committed person's inmate's own testimony in 24    the form of an affidavit or documentation, or a third 25    party's documentation or testimony in the form of an 26    affidavit that the committed person inmate likely engaged   HB3449- 13 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    in any full-time substance abuse programs, correctional 2    industry assignments, educational programs, behavior 3    modification programs, life skills courses, or re-entry 4    planning provided by the Department under paragraph (4) 5    and satisfactorily completed the assigned program as 6    determined by the standards of the Department during the 7    committed person's inmate's current term of incarceration.8    (C) If the committed person inmate can provide 9documentation that he or she is entitled to sentence credit 10under subparagraph (B) in excess of 45 days of participation 11in those programs, the committed person inmate shall receive 1290 days of sentence credit. If the committed person inmate 13cannot provide documentation of more than 45 days of 14participation in those programs, the committed person inmate 15shall receive 45 days of sentence credit. In the event of a 16disagreement between the Department and the committed person 17inmate as to the amount of credit accumulated under 18subparagraph (B), if the Department provides documented proof 19of a lesser amount of days of participation in those programs, 20that proof shall control. If the Department provides no 21documentary proof, the committed person's inmate's proof as 22set forth in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall control as 23to the amount of sentence credit provided.24    (D) If the committed person inmate has been convicted of a 25sex offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 26Registration Act, sentencing credits under subparagraph (B) of   HB3449- 14 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1this paragraph (4) shall be awarded by the Department only if 2the conditions set forth in paragraph (4.6) of subsection (a) 3are satisfied. No committed person inmate serving a term of 4natural life imprisonment shall receive sentence credit under 5subparagraph (B) of this paragraph (4).6    (E) The rules and regulations shall provide for the 7recalculation of program credits awarded pursuant to this 8paragraph (4) prior to July 1, 2021 (the effective date of 9Public Act 101-652) at the rate set for such credits on and 10after July 1, 2021. 11    Educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavior 12modification programs, life skills courses, re-entry planning, 13and correctional industry programs under which sentence credit 14may be earned under this paragraph (4) and paragraph (4.1) of 15this subsection (a) shall be evaluated by the Department on 16the basis of documented standards. The Department shall report 17the results of these evaluations to the Governor and the 18General Assembly by September 30th of each year. The reports 19shall include data relating to the recidivism rate among 20program participants.21    Availability of these programs shall be subject to the 22limits of fiscal resources appropriated by the General 23Assembly for these purposes. Eligible committed persons 24inmates who are denied immediate admission shall be placed on 25a waiting list under criteria established by the Department. 26The rules and regulations shall provide that a committed   HB3449- 15 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1person prisoner who has been placed on a waiting list but is 2transferred for non-disciplinary reasons before beginning a 3program shall receive priority placement on the waitlist for 4appropriate programs at the new facility. The inability of any 5committed person inmate to become engaged in any such programs 6by reason of insufficient program resources or for any other 7reason established under the rules and regulations of the 8Department shall not be deemed a cause of action under which 9the Department or any employee or agent of the Department 10shall be liable for damages to the committed person inmate. 11The rules and regulations shall provide that a committed 12person prisoner who begins an educational, vocational, 13substance abuse, work-release programs or activities in 14accordance with Article 13 of Chapter III of this Code, 15behavior modification program, life skills course, re-entry 16planning, or correctional industry programs but is unable to 17complete the program due to illness, disability, transfer, 18lockdown, or another reason outside of the committed person's 19prisoner's control shall receive prorated sentence credits for 20the days in which the committed person prisoner did 21participate. 22    (F) The Department shall award sentence credit under this 23paragraph (4) accumulated prior to the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly in an amount 25specified in subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (4) to a 26committed person serving a sentence for an offense committed   HB3449- 16 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1after June 19, 1998, if the Department determines that the 2committed person is entitled to this sentence credit, based 3upon:4        (i) documentation provided by the Department that the 5    committed person engaged in any full-time substance abuse 6    programs, correctional industry assignments, educational 7    programs, behavior modification programs, life skills 8    courses, or re-entry planning provided by the Department 9    under this paragraph (4) and satisfactorily completed the 10    assigned program as determined by the standards of the 11    Department during the committed person's current term of 12    incarceration; or13        (ii) the committed person's own testimony in the form 14    of an affidavit or documentation, or a third party's 15    documentation or testimony in the form of an affidavit 16    that the committed person likely engaged in any full-time 17    substance abuse programs, correctional industry 18    assignments, educational programs, behavior modification 19    programs, life skills courses, or re-entry planning 20    provided by the Department under paragraph (4) and 21    satisfactorily completed the assigned program as 22    determined by the standards of the Department during the 23    committed person's current term of incarceration.24    (G) If the committed person can provide documentation that 25he or she is entitled to sentence credit under subparagraph 26(E), the committed person shall receive such sentence credit.   HB3449- 17 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1If the committed person cannot provide documentation of 2participation in those programs, the committed person shall 3receive up to 0.5 days of sentence credit for each day of 4participation in such a program. In the event of a 5disagreement between the Department and the committed person 6as to the amount of credit accumulated under subparagraph (E), 7if the Department provides documented proof of a lesser amount 8of days of participation in those programs, that proof shall 9control. If the Department provides no documentary proof, the 10committed person's proof as set forth in clause (ii) of 11subparagraph (E) shall control as to the amount of sentence 12credit provided. 13    (4.1) Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this 14subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall also provide 15that an additional 90 days of sentence credit shall be awarded 16to any committed person prisoner who passes high school 17equivalency testing while the committed person prisoner is 18committed to the Department of Corrections. The sentence 19credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition 20to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under 21any other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be 22pursuant to the guidelines and restrictions set forth in 23paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Section. The sentence 24credit provided for in this paragraph shall be available only 25to those committed persons prisoners who have not previously 26earned a high school diploma or a State of Illinois High School   HB3449- 18 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1Diploma. If, after an award of the high school equivalency 2testing sentence credit has been made, the Department 3determines that the committed person prisoner was not 4eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The Department may 5also award 90 days of sentence credit to any committed person 6who passed high school equivalency testing while he or she was 7held in pre-trial detention prior to the current commitment to 8the Department of Corrections. Except as provided in paragraph 9(4.7) of this subsection (a), the rules and regulations shall 10provide that an additional 120 days of sentence credit shall 11be awarded to any committed person prisoner who obtains an 12associate degree while the committed person prisoner is 13committed to the Department of Corrections, regardless of the 14date that the associate degree was obtained, including if 15prior to July 1, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 16101-652). The sentence credit awarded under this paragraph 17(4.1) shall be in addition to, and shall not affect, the award 18of sentence credit under any other paragraph of this Section, 19but shall also be under the guidelines and restrictions set 20forth in paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Section. The 21sentence credit provided for in this paragraph (4.1) shall be 22available only to those committed persons prisoners who have 23not previously earned an associate degree prior to the current 24commitment to the Department of Corrections. If, after an 25award of the associate degree sentence credit has been made 26and the Department determines that the committed person   HB3449- 19 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1prisoner was not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. 2The Department may also award 120 days of sentence credit to 3any committed person who earned an associate degree while he 4or she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the current 5commitment to the Department of Corrections. 6    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 7(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 8additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 9committed person prisoner who obtains a bachelor's degree 10while the committed person prisoner is committed to the 11Department of Corrections. The sentence credit awarded under 12this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition to, and shall not 13affect, the award of sentence credit under any other paragraph 14of this Section, but shall also be under the guidelines and 15restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of this subsection 16(a). The sentence credit provided for in this paragraph shall 17be available only to those committed persons prisoners who 18have not earned a bachelor's degree prior to the current 19commitment to the Department of Corrections. If, after an 20award of the bachelor's degree sentence credit has been made, 21the Department determines that the committed person prisoner 22was not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The 23Department may also award 180 days of sentence credit to any 24committed person who earned a bachelor's degree while he or 25she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the current 26commitment to the Department of Corrections.  HB3449- 20 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    Except as provided in paragraph (4.7) of this subsection 2(a), the rules and regulations shall provide that an 3additional 180 days of sentence credit shall be awarded to any 4committed person prisoner who obtains a master's or 5professional degree while the committed person prisoner is 6committed to the Department of Corrections. The sentence 7credit awarded under this paragraph (4.1) shall be in addition 8to, and shall not affect, the award of sentence credit under 9any other paragraph of this Section, but shall also be under 10the guidelines and restrictions set forth in paragraph (4) of 11this subsection (a). The sentence credit provided for in this 12paragraph shall be available only to those committed persons 13prisoners who have not previously earned a master's or 14professional degree prior to the current commitment to the 15Department of Corrections. If, after an award of the master's 16or professional degree sentence credit has been made, the 17Department determines that the committed person prisoner was 18not eligible, then the award shall be revoked. The Department 19may also award 180 days of sentence credit to any committed 20person who earned a master's or professional degree while he 21or she was held in pre-trial detention prior to the current 22commitment to the Department of Corrections.23    (4.2)(A) The rules and regulations shall also provide that 24any committed person prisoner engaged in self-improvement 25programs, volunteer work, or work assignments that are not 26otherwise eligible activities under paragraph (4), shall   HB3449- 21 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1receive up to 0.5 days of sentence credit for each day in which 2the committed person prisoner is engaged in activities 3described in this paragraph. 4    (B) The rules and regulations shall provide for the award 5of sentence credit under this paragraph (4.2) for qualifying 6days of engagement in eligible activities occurring prior to 7July 1, 2021 (the effective date of Public Act 101-652). 8    (4.5) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 9also provide that when the court's sentencing order recommends 10a committed person prisoner for substance abuse treatment and 11the crime was committed on or after September 1, 2003 (the 12effective date of Public Act 93-354), the committed person 13prisoner shall receive no sentence credit awarded under clause 14(3) of this subsection (a) unless he or she participates in and 15completes a substance abuse treatment program. The Director of 16Corrections may waive the requirement to participate in or 17complete a substance abuse treatment program in specific 18instances if the committed person prisoner is not a good 19candidate for a substance abuse treatment program for medical, 20programming, or operational reasons. Availability of substance 21abuse treatment shall be subject to the limits of fiscal 22resources appropriated by the General Assembly for these 23purposes. If treatment is not available and the requirement to 24participate and complete the treatment has not been waived by 25the Director, the committed person prisoner shall be placed on 26a waiting list under criteria established by the Department.   HB3449- 22 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1The Director may allow a committed person prisoner placed on a 2waiting list to participate in and complete a substance abuse 3education class or attend substance abuse self-help meetings 4in lieu of a substance abuse treatment program. A committed 5person prisoner on a waiting list who is not placed in a 6substance abuse program prior to release may be eligible for a 7waiver and receive sentence credit under clause (3) of this 8subsection (a) at the discretion of the Director.9    (4.6) The rules and regulations on sentence credit shall 10also provide that a committed person prisoner who has been 11convicted of a sex offense as defined in Section 2 of the Sex 12Offender Registration Act shall receive no sentence credit 13unless he or she either has successfully completed or is 14participating in sex offender treatment as defined by the Sex 15Offender Management Board. However, committed persons 16prisoners who are waiting to receive treatment, but who are 17unable to do so due solely to the lack of resources on the part 18of the Department, may, at either Director's sole discretion, 19be awarded sentence credit at a rate as the Director shall 20determine.21    (4.7) On or after January 1, 2018 (the effective date of 22Public Act 100-3), sentence credit under paragraph (3), (4), 23or (4.1) of this subsection (a) may be awarded to a committed 24person prisoner who is serving a sentence, whenever that 25credit was earned for an offense described in paragraph (2), 26(2.3), (2.4), (2.5), or (2.6) for credit earned on or after   HB3449- 23 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1January 1, 2018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-3); 2provided, the award of the credits under this paragraph (4.7) 3shall not reduce the sentence of the prisoner to less than the 4following amounts:5        (i) 85% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 6    required to serve 85% of his or her sentence; or7        (ii) 60% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 8    required to serve 75% of his or her sentence, except if the 9    prisoner is serving a sentence for gunrunning his or her 10    sentence shall not be reduced to less than 75%.11        (iii) 100% of his or her sentence if the prisoner is 12    required to serve 100% of his or her sentence.13    (5) Whenever the Department is to release any committed 14person inmate earlier than it otherwise would because of a 15grant of earned sentence credit under paragraph (3) of 16subsection (a) of this Section given at any time during the 17term, the Department shall give reasonable notice of the 18impending release not less than 14 days prior to the date of 19the release to the State's Attorney of the county where the 20prosecution of the committed person inmate took place, and if 21applicable, the State's Attorney of the county into which the 22committed person inmate will be released. The Department must 23also make identification information and a recent photo of the 24committed person inmate being released accessible on the 25Internet by means of a hyperlink labeled "Community 26Notification of Committed Person Inmate Early Release" on the   HB3449- 24 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1Department's World Wide Web homepage. The identification 2information shall include the committed person's inmate's: 3name, any known alias, date of birth, physical 4characteristics, commitment offense, and county where 5conviction was imposed. The identification information shall 6be placed on the website within 3 days of the committed 7person's inmate's release and the information may not be 8removed until either: completion of the first year of 9mandatory supervised release or return of the committed person 10inmate to custody of the Department.11    (b) Whenever a person is or has been committed under 12several convictions, with separate sentences, the sentences 13shall be construed under Section 5-8-4 in granting and 14forfeiting of sentence credit.15    (c) (1) The Department shall prescribe rules and 16regulations for revoking sentence credit, including revoking 17sentence credit awarded under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) 18of this Section. The Department shall prescribe rules and 19regulations establishing and requiring the use of a sanctions 20matrix for revoking sentence credit. The Department shall 21prescribe rules and regulations for suspending or reducing the 22rate of accumulation of sentence credit for specific rule 23violations, during imprisonment. These rules and regulations 24shall provide that no committed person inmate may be penalized 25more than one year of sentence credit for any one infraction.26    (2) When the Department seeks to revoke, suspend, or   HB3449- 25 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1reduce the rate of accumulation of any sentence credits for an 2alleged infraction of its rules, it shall bring charges 3therefor against the committed person prisoner sought to be so 4deprived of sentence credits before the Prisoner Review Board 5as provided in subparagraph (a)(4) of Section 3-3-2 of this 6Code, if the amount of credit at issue exceeds 30 days, whether 7from one infraction or cumulatively from multiple infractions 8arising out of a single event, or when, during any 12-month 9period, the cumulative amount of credit revoked exceeds 30 10days except where the infraction is committed or discovered 11within 60 days of scheduled release. In those cases, the 12Department of Corrections may revoke up to 30 days of sentence 13credit. The Board may subsequently approve the revocation of 14additional sentence credit, if the Department seeks to revoke 15sentence credit in excess of 30 days. However, the Board shall 16not be empowered to review the Department's decision with 17respect to the loss of 30 days of sentence credit within any 18calendar year for any committed person prisoner or to increase 19any penalty beyond the length requested by the Department.20    (3) The Director of Corrections or the Director of 21Juvenile Justice, in appropriate cases, may restore sentence 22credits which have been revoked, suspended, or reduced. The 23Department shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the 24restoration of sentence credits. These rules and regulations 25shall provide for the automatic restoration of sentence 26credits following a period in which the committed person   HB3449- 26 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1prisoner maintains a record without a disciplinary violation.2    Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 3Prisoner Review Board from ordering, pursuant to Section 43-3-9(a)(3)(i)(B), that a committed person prisoner serve up 5to one year of the sentence imposed by the court that was not 6served due to the accumulation of sentence credit.7    (d) If a lawsuit is filed by a committed person prisoner in 8an Illinois or federal court against the State, the Department 9of Corrections, or the Prisoner Review Board, or against any 10of their officers or employees, and the court makes a specific 11finding that a pleading, motion, or other paper filed by the 12committed person prisoner is frivolous, the Department of 13Corrections shall conduct a hearing to revoke up to 180 days of 14sentence credit by bringing charges against the committed 15person prisoner sought to be deprived of the sentence credits 16before the Prisoner Review Board as provided in subparagraph 17(a)(8) of Section 3-3-2 of this Code. If the committed person 18prisoner has not accumulated 180 days of sentence credit at 19the time of the finding, then the Prisoner Review Board may 20revoke all sentence credit accumulated by the committed person 21prisoner.22    For purposes of this subsection (d):23        (1) "Frivolous" means that a pleading, motion, or 24    other filing which purports to be a legal document filed 25    by a committed person prisoner in his or her lawsuit meets 26    any or all of the following criteria:  HB3449- 27 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1            (A) it lacks an arguable basis either in law or in 2        fact;3            (B) it is being presented for any improper 4        purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary 5        delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation;6            (C) the claims, defenses, and other legal 7        contentions therein are not warranted by existing law 8        or by a nonfrivolous argument for the extension, 9        modification, or reversal of existing law or the 10        establishment of new law;11            (D) the allegations and other factual contentions 12        do not have evidentiary support or, if specifically so 13        identified, are not likely to have evidentiary support 14        after a reasonable opportunity for further 15        investigation or discovery; or16            (E) the denials of factual contentions are not 17        warranted on the evidence, or if specifically so 18        identified, are not reasonably based on a lack of 19        information or belief.20        (2) "Lawsuit" means a motion pursuant to Section 116-3 21    of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963, a habeas corpus 22    action under Article X of the Code of Civil Procedure or 23    under federal law (28 U.S.C. 2254), a petition for claim 24    under the Court of Claims Act, an action under the federal 25    Civil Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 1983), or a second or 26    subsequent petition for post-conviction relief under   HB3449- 28 -LRB104 09292 RLC 19350 b1    Article 122 of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 2    whether filed with or without leave of court or a second or 3    subsequent petition for relief from judgment under Section 4    2-1401 of the Code of Civil Procedure.5    (e) Nothing in Public Act 90-592 or 90-593 affects the 6validity of Public Act 89-404.7    (f) Whenever the Department is to release any committed 8person inmate who has been convicted of a violation of an order 9of protection under Section 12-3.4 or 12-30 of the Criminal 10Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, earlier than it 11otherwise would because of a grant of sentence credit, the 12Department, as a condition of release, shall require that the 13person, upon release, be placed under electronic surveillance 14as provided in Section 5-8A-7 of this Code. 15(Source: P.A. 102-28, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 16102-784, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-51, eff. 171-1-24; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-330, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 18eff. 7-1-24; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202026.